Utah statutes.
26-35a-107.   Adjustment to nursing care facility Medicaid reimbursement rates.

If federal law or regulation prohibits the money in the Nursing Care Facilities Account from being used in the manner set forth in Subsection 26-35a-106(1)(b), the rates paid to nursing care facilities for providing services pursuant to the Medicaid program shall be changed as follows:

(1)  except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), to the rates paid to nursing care facilities on June 30, 2004; or

(2)  if the Legislature or the department has on or after July 1, 2004, changed the rates paid to facilities through a manner other than the use of expenditures from the Nursing Care Facilities Account, to the rates provided for by the Legislature or the department.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

